Oklahoma, session 2026, HB3176.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
HB3176 HFLR Page 1
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 5003.20 of Title 74, unless
there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
There is hereby created the Oklahoma Gas, Artificial
Intelligence, and Space Research Hub (GAS Hub) to serve as the State
of Oklahoma's central coordinating entity for the recruitment,
development, and hosting of a United States National Laboratory.
The GAS Hub shall function as a state-federal partnership platform
to attract, secure, and support federal laboratory designation,
funding, and operations.
SECTION 2. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 5003.20a of Title 74, unless
there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. The purposes of the Oklahoma Gas, Artificial Intelligence,
and Space Research Hub (GAS Hub) are to:
1. Position Oklahoma as a leading national center for:
a. advanced oil and gas research,
b. artificial intelligence and high-performance
computing, and
c. aerospace, space launch systems, and orbital
technologies;
2. Prepare and maintain federal-ready laboratory sites;
3. Coordinate workforce pipelines;
4. Aggregate state incentives and infrastructure; and
HB3176 HFLR Page 2
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

5. Serve as the formal applicant and liaison to the U.S.
Department of Energy, the National Aeronautics and Space
Administration, Department of War, and other federal agencies.
B. The GAS Hub shall be administered by the Oklahoma Department
of Commerce, and shall provide necessary staffing for the GAS Hub,
in coordination with:
1. The Oklahoma Corporation Commission;
2. The Oklahoma Space Industry Development Authority (OSIDA);
3. The State Regents for Higher Education;
4. The Oklahoma Department of Transportation; and
5. The Office of Management and Enterprise Services.
C. The GAS Hub may enter into public-private partnerships to:
1. Develop research parks;
2. Construct laboratory campuses;
3. Build high-performance computing facilities; and
4. Construct spaceport and test range infrastructure.
D. The GAS Hub shall prepare and maintain a formal strategy
for:
1. U.S. Department of Energy National Lab designation;
2. U.S. National Aeronautics and Space Administration center
designation;
3. U.S. Department of War research campus designation; and
4. Federally Funded Research and Development Center status.

HB3176 HFLR Page 3
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

E. The GAS Hub shall submit an annual report to the Governor,
President Pro Tempore of the Oklahoma Senate, and the Speaker of the
Oklahoma House of Representatives detailing:
1. Federal engagement;
2. Site readiness;
3. Funds expended;
4. Workforce pipeline development; and
5. Federal designation progress.
SECTION 3. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 5003.20b of Title 74, unless
there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. There is hereby created the Oklahoma National Laboratory
Development Program to:
1. Identify and certify federal-ready laboratory sites;
2. Pre-permit utility, water, rail, and highway access;
3. Aggregate state tax incentives;
4. Coordinate land acquisition and site assembly;
5. Maintain pre-approved environmental compliance documents;
and
6. Prepare formal federal applications.
B. This program shall be administered by the Oklahoma Gas,
Artificial Intelligence, and Space Research Hub in coordination with
other state agencies.

HB3176 HFLR Page 4
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

SECTION 4. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 5003.20c of Title 74, unless
there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
The Oklahoma Department of Commerce shall promulgate rules to
implement this act.
SECTION 5. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.

COMMITTEE REPORT BY: COMMITTEE ON COMMERCE AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
OVERSIGHT, dated 02/26/2026 - DO PASS, As Coauthored.
















HB3176 HFLR Page 5
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.